Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.980

Impact fee annual report.

(1) Beginning December 1, 2018, and each year thereafter, the department of commerce must prepare an annual report on the impact fee deferral process established in RCW 82.02.050(3). The report must include: (a) The number of deferrals requested of and issued by counties, cities, and towns; (b) the number of deferrals that were not fully and timely paid; and (c) other information as deemed appropriate.

(2) The report required by this section must, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, be submitted to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

[ 2015 c 241 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 241: See note following RCW 82.02.050.